test/src/morphology/adj-2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Oddsyllable adjectives. Adjectives that belong to TJIEGOS, GÅNTSAS, GALMAS, SÁJSAS, LUOBES, GIMES, LINES, OAMES, BASSTEL, DABÁR, MUTTÁK, SKÁRBAK, ALLAK, GÅBDDÅK, STUORAK, måjdås, SJÆVNNJAT, SUOHKAT, LÅSSÅT, TSIBTSA, TJALMMIS, IENNILS.

# Attribute is the same as pred.

Tests:

  Adjective - rádas: # TJIEGOS
    rádas+A+Attr: [rádas, ráda]
    rádas+A+Sg+Nom: rádas
    rádas+A+Sg+Ine: ráddasin
    rádas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: ráddasabbo
    rádas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ráddasamos
    rádas+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: ráddasappot
    rádas+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: ráddasabmusit
    rádas+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: ráddasappusj
    rádas+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: ráddasapputjit
    rádas+A+Der/at+Adv: ráddasit
    rádas+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: [rádasvuohta, rádavuohta]

  Adjective - guojttis: # TJIEGOS
    guojttis+A+Attr: [guojttis, guojttisis]
    guojttis+A+Sg+Nom: guojttis
    guojttis+A+Sg+Acc: guojttisav
    guojttis+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: guojttisabbo
    guojttis+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: guojttisamos
    guojttis+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: guojttisappot
    guojttis+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: guojttisabmusit
    guojttis+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: guojttisappusj
    guojttis+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: guojttisapputjit
    guojttis+A+Der/at+Adv: guojttisit
    guojttis+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: [guojttisvuohta, guojttisisvuohta]

  Adjective - ridák: # TJIEGOS
    ridák+A+Attr: [ridák, ridágis]
    ridák+A+Sg+Nom: ridák
    ridák+A+Sg+Acc: ridágav
    ridák+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: ridágabbo
    ridák+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ridágamos
    ridák+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: ridágappot
    ridák+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: ridágabmusit
    ridák+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: ridágappusj
    ridák+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: ridágapputjit
    ridák+A+Der/at+Adv: ridágit
    ridák+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: [ridákvuohta, ridágisvuohta]

  Adjective - dievas: # TJIEGOS and GALMAS
    dievas+A+Attr: [dievas, dievva]
    dievas+A+Sg+Nom: dievas
    dievas+A+Sg+Gen: dievvasa
    dievas+A+Sg+Acc: dievvasav
    dievas+A+Sg+Ill: dievvasij
    dievas+A+Sg+Ine: dievvasin
    dievas+A+Sg+Ela: dievvasis
    dievas+A+Sg+Com: dievvasijn
    dievas+A+Pl+Nom: dievvasa
    dievas+A+Pl+Gen: dievvasij
    dievas+A+Pl+Acc: dievvasijt
    dievas+A+Pl+Ill: dievvasijda
    dievas+A+Pl+Ine: dievvasijn
    dievas+A+Pl+Ela: dievvasijs
    dievas+A+Pl+Com: dievvasij
    dievas+A+Ess: dievvasin
    dievas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: dievvasabbo
    dievas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dievvasamos
    dievas+A+Der/at+Adv: dievvasit


  Adjective - vijdes: # TJIEGOS
    vijdes+A+Attr: vijdes 
    vijdes+A+Sg+Nom: vijdes
    vijdes+A+Sg+Gen: vijddása
    vijdes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vijddásabbo
    vijdes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vijddásamos

  Adjective - vájves: # TJIEGOS
    vájves+A+Attr: vájves
    vájves+A+Sg+Nom: vájves
    vájves+A+Sg+Gen: vájvvása
    vájves+A+Sg+Acc: vájvvásav
    vájves+A+Sg+Ill: vájvvásij
    vájves+A+Sg+Ine: vájvvásin
    vájves+A+Sg+Ela: vájvvásis
    vájves+A+Sg+Com: vájvvásijn
    vájves+A+Pl+Nom: vájvvása
    vájves+A+Pl+Gen: vájvvásij
    vájves+A+Pl+Acc: vájvvásijt
    vájves+A+Pl+Ill: vájvvásijda
    vájves+A+Pl+Ine: vájvvásijn
    vájves+A+Pl+Ela: vájvvásijs
    vájves+A+Pl+Com: vájvvásij
    vájves+A+Ess: vájvvásin
    vájves+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vájvvásabbo
    vájves+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vájvvásamos

  Adjective - divtes: # TJIEGOS
    divtes+A+Attr: divtes
    divtes+A+Sg+Nom: divtes
    divtes+A+Sg+Acc: diktásav
    divtes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: diktásabbo
    divtes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: diktásamos
    divtes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: diktásappot
    divtes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: diktásabmusit
    divtes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: diktásappusj
    divtes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: diktásapputjit
    divtes+A+Der/at+Adv: diktásit
    divtes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: divtesvuohta

  Adjective - tjoaskes: # TJIEGOS
    tjoaskes+A+Attr: tjoaskes 
    tjoaskes+A+Sg+Nom: tjoaskes 
    tjoaskes+A+Sg+Com: tjoasskásijn 
    tjoaskes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásabbo
    tjoaskes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásamos
    tjoaskes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: tjoasskásappot
    tjoaskes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: tjoasskásabmusit
    tjoaskes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásappusj
    tjoaskes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: tjoasskásapputjit
    tjoaskes+A+Der/at+Adv: tjoasskásit
    tjoaskes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: tjoaskesvuohta

  Adjective - goasvos: # TJIEGOS and GOAVSOS
    goavsos+A+Attr: goavsos
    goavsos+A+Sg+Nom: goavsos
    goavsos+A+Sg+Gen: [goaksu,goaksusa]
    goavsos+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [goaksup,goaksusabbo]
    goavsos+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [goaksumus,goaksusamos]
    goavsos+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [goaksubut, goaksusappot]
    goavsos+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [goaksumusát, goaksusabmusit]
    goavsos+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [goaksubusj, goaksusappusj]
    goavsos+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [goaksubuttjat, goaksusapputjit]
    goavsos+A+Der/at+Adv: goaksut
    goavsos+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: goavsosvuohta

  Adjective - sáltes: # TJIEGOS and SÁDNES
    sáltes+A+Attr: sáltes
    sáltes+A+Sg+Nom: sáltes
    sáltes+A+Sg+Ine: [sálltán, sálltásin]
    sáltes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [sálltáp, sálltásabbo]
    sáltes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [sálltámus, sálltásamos]
    sáltes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [sálltábut, sálltásappot]
    sáltes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [sálltámusát, sálltásabmusit]
    sáltes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [sálltábusj, sálltásappusj]
    sáltes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [sálltábuttjat, sálltásapputjit]
    sáltes+A+Der/at+Adv: [sálltát, sálltásit]
    sáltes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: sáltesvuohta

  Adjective - måskas: # GÅNTSAS
    måskas+A+Attr: måskas
    måskas+A+Sg+Nom: måskas
    måskas+A+Sg+Com: moasskasijn
    måskas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: moasskasabbo
    måskas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: moasskasamos
    måskas+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: moasskasappot
    måskas+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: moasskasabmusit
    måskas+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: moasskasappusj
    måskas+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: moasskasapputjit
    måskas+A+Der/at+Adv: moasskasit
    måskas+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: måskasvuohta

  Adjective - báhkas: # GALMAS
    báhkas+A+Attr: báhkka
    báhkas+A+Sg+Nom: báhkas
    báhkas+A+Sg+Acc: báhkkasav
    báhkas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: báhkkasabbo
    báhkas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: báhkkasamos
    báhkas+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: báhkkasappot
    báhkas+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: báhkkasabmusit
    báhkas+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: báhkkasappusj
    báhkas+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: báhkkasapputjit
    báhkas+A+Der/at+Adv: báhkkasit
    báhkas+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: báhkkavuohta

  Adjective - gimás: # GALMAS
    gimás+A+Attr: gibma
    gimás+A+Sg+Nom: gimás
    gimás+A+Sg+Acc: gibmasav
    gimás+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gibmasabbo
    gimás+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gibmasamos
    gimás+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: gibmasappot
    gimás+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: gibmasabmusit
    gimás+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: gibmasappusj
    gimás+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: gibmasapputjit
    gimás+A+Der/at+Adv: gibmasit
    gimás+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: gibmavuohta

  Adjective - tjåmås: # GALMAS
    tjåmås+A+Attr: tjåbmå
    tjåmås+A+Sg+Nom: tjåmås
    tjåmås+A+Sg+Acc: tjåbmåsav
    tjåmås+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjåbmåsabbo
    tjåmås+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjåbmåsamos
    tjåmås+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: tjåbmåsappot
    tjåmås+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: tjåbmåsabmusit
    tjåmås+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: tjåbmåsappusj
    tjåmås+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: tjåbmåsapputjit
    tjåmås+A+Der/at+Adv: tjåbmåsit
    tjåmås+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: tjåbmåvuohta

  Adjective - sájsas: # SÁJSAS
    sájsas+A+Attr: sájsse
    sájsas+A+Sg+Nom: sájsas
    sájsas+A+Sg+Ine: sájssasin
    sájsas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sájssasabbo
    sájsas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sájssasamos
    sájsas+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: sájssasappusj
    sájsas+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: sájssasapputjit
    sájsas+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: sájssasappot
    sájsas+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: sájssasabmusit
    sájsas+A+Der/at+Adv: sájssasit
    sájsas+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: sájssevuohta

  Adjective - snáves: # LUOBES and TJIEGOS
    snáves+A+Attr: snáves
    snáves+A+Sg+Nom: snáves
    snáves+A+Sg+Acc: [snávvásav, snávvasav]
    snáves+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [snávvásabbo, snávvasabbo]
    snáves+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [snávvasamos, snávvásamos]
    snáves+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [snávvasappot, snávvásappot]
    snáves+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [snávvasabmusit, snávvásabmusit]
    snáves+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [snávvasappusj, snávvásappusj]
    snáves+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [snávvasapputjit, snávvásapputjit]
    snáves+A+Der/at+Adv: [snávvasit, snávvásit]
    snáves+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: snávesvuohta

  Adjective - luobes: # LUOBES
    luobes+A+Attr: luobes 
    luobes+A+Sg+Nom: luobes
    luobes+A+Sg+Acc: luohpasav
    luobes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: luohpasabbo
    luobes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: luohpasamos

  Adjective - gimes: # GIMES
    gimes+A+Attr: gibma 
    gimes+A+Sg+Nom: gimes
    gimes+A+Sg+Acc: gibmasav
    gimes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gibmasabbo
    gimes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gibmasamos

  Adjective - dimes: # GIMES and LINES
    dimes+A+Attr: dibma
    dimes+A+Sg+Nom: dimes
    dimes+A+Sg+Acc: [dibmasav, dibmásav]
    dimes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dibmasabbo, dibmasabbo]
    dimes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dibmasamos, dibmásamos]
    dimes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [dibmasappot, dibmásappot]
    dimes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [dibmasabmusit, dibmásabmusit]
    dimes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [dibmasappusj, dibmásappusj]
    dimes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [dibmasapputjit, dibmásapputjit]
    dimes+A+Der/at+Adv: [dibmasit, dibmásit]
    dimes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: dibmavuohta

  Adjective - vánes: # LINES and  LEXATTR
    vánes+A+Attr: [vánes, vádna]
    vánes+A+Sg+Nom: vánes
    vánes+A+Sg+Gen: vádnása
    vánes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vádnásabbo
    vánes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vádnásamos

  Adjective - suvres: # LINES and SUVRES
    suvres+A+Attr: suvra
    suvres+A+Sg+Nom: suvres
    suvres+A+Sg+Gen: [suvrrá, suvrrása]
    suvres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [suvrráp, suvrrásabbo]
    suvres+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [suvrrámus, suvrrásamos]
    suvres+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [suvrrábut, suvrrásappot]
    suvres+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [suvrrámusát, suvrrásabmusit]
    suvres+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [suvrrábusj, suvrrásappusj]
    suvres+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [suvrrábuttjat, suvrrásapputjit]
    suvres+A+Der/at+Adv: [suvrrát, suvrrásit]
    suvres+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: suvravuohta

  Adjective - fijnes: # LINES
    fijnes+A+Attr: fijnna
    fijnes+A+Sg+Nom: fijnes
    fijnes+A+Sg+Gen: fijnnása
    fijnes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [fijnnásabbo, fijnáp]
    fijnes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [fijnnásamos, fijnámus]
    fijnes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [fijnnásappot, fijnábut]
    fijnes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [fijnnásabmusit, fijnámusát]
    fijnes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [fijnnásappsuj, fijnábusj]
    fijnes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [fijnnsapputjit, fijnábuttjat]
    fijnes+A+Der/at+Adv: [fijnnásit, fijnát]
    fijnes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: fijnnavuohta

  Adjective - goastes: # OAMES
    goastes+A+Attr: goasste 
    goastes+A+Sg+Nom: goastes
    goastes+A+Sg+Gen: goasstása
    goastes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: goasstásabbo
    goastes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: goasstásamos
    goastes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: goasstásappot
    goastes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: goasstásabmusit
    goastes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: goasstásappusj
    goastes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: goasstásapputjit
    goastes+A+Der/at+Adv: goasstásit
    goastes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: goasstevuohta
